District of Columbia statutes.
2-1328

Compensation.

All members shall serve without compensation, but expenses incurred by the Commission as a whole, or by its individual members, when duly authorized by the Chairperson, will become an obligation against appropriated District of Columbia and federal funds designated for that purpose.

History

Sept. 29, 1976, D.C. Law 1-86, title IV, § 408, 23 DCR 2543

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-2328.
1973 Ed., § 6-1928.